Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-487
Posting of areas.

Upon
receipt of a license under sections 37-484 to 37-496, the licensee
shall promptly post such licensed areas according to the requirements prescribed
by the commission.

Laws 1957, c. 152, § 4, p. 493;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-904;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 197;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 18.